Wyoming statutes. Title 25 Institutions of the State
Chapter 8 Wyoming Pioneer Home and Wyoming Retirement Center

Cross references. —

For constitutional provisions as to the establishment of charitable and penal institutions under the supervision of the state board of charities and reform, see art. 7, § 18, Wyo. Const.

As to general supervision and control of Wyoming pioneer home and Wyoming retirement center by department of health, see §

9-2-2005

.

As to public health and safety in regard to state institutions generally, see title 35.

§ 25-8-101.
Purpose.

Except as otherwise authorized by rules and regulations promulgated in accordance with W.S. 9-2-106(d), the purpose of the pioneer home and the Wyoming retirement center is to provide a place for the care and maintenance of residents of this state who are afflicted with the infirmities of old age.

History.

Laws 1950, Sp. Sess., ch. 6, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 9-480; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-902; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1985, ch. 181, § 1; 1998, ch. 11, § 1.

§ 25-8-102.
Powers and duties of department of health.

The department of health may:

Construct, maintain, equip, operate and manage the pioneer home and the Wyoming retirement center;

Purchase, rent or otherwise provide the equipment, materials or supplies necessary to carry out the purposes hereof;

Dispose of equipment, materials and supplies no longer required in the operations of the pioneer home or the Wyoming retirement center;

Adopt rules and regulations for the admission, conduct and discharge of residents;

Accept gifts on behalf of the state for the use of the pioneer home and the Wyoming retirement center;

Provide medical care for residents of the Wyoming retirement center.

History.

Laws 1950, Sp. Sess., ch. 6, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 9-481; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-903; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1985, ch. 181, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 25-8-103.
Conditions for admission; charges for care.

Admission to the pioneer home and the Wyoming retirement center shall be voluntary and only upon prior approval by the department of health. Indigent aged persons may be cared for without charge. Nonindigent aged persons may be cared for under terms and conditions fixed by the department pursuant to W.S.

25-11-101

through

25-11-108

.

History.

Laws 1950, Sp. Sess., ch. 6, § 4; 1951, ch. 111, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-482; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-904; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1985, ch. 181, § 1; 1989, ch. 50, § 2; 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

§ 25-8-104.
Receipt and disposition of revenues and gifts.

All revenues received from the operation of the pioneer home and from gifts given for the general purpose of the pioneer home shall be paid over to the state treasurer and deposited in the general fund. Gifts given for a specific purpose shall be kept in a separate account to be expended by the department of health for the specific purpose.

The department shall deposit all funds received, collected by or donated to the Wyoming retirement center for care of patients into the special revenue fund. The funds collected are appropriated to the department and shall only be expended to fund the operation of the Wyoming retirement center and shall be disbursed pursuant to W.S.

9-4-304

.

History.

Laws 1950, Sp. Sess., ch. 6, § 5; 1955, ch. 26, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 9-483; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-905; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1985, ch. 181, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2017 ch. 54, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “a separate account” for “an account within the trust and agency fund.”

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, added (b); and in present (a), deleted “and the Wyoming retirement center” following “pioneer home” twice.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”